New Jersey, session 221, S953.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer who is an eligible educator shall be allowed a deduction against gross income of up to $1,200 for unreimbursed expenses incurred by the taxpayer for the purchase of classroom supplies during the taxable year. b.    As used in this section: Classroom supplies means books, pencils and other drawing supplies, computers and related equipment, laboratory equipment, and any other equipment and supplementary materials needed for day-to-day classroom activities. "Eligible educator" means an individual who is employed as a teacher in a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school in this State. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.